California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Notwithstanding Section 15840, the income eligibility requirements specified in Section 15832, and the annual redetermination requirements described in Section 14005.37, a pregnant individual or targeted low-income child who is eligible for and is receiving health care coverage under a Medi-Cal program identified in subdivision (b) shall be eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits for the duration of the pregnancy and for a period of one year following the last day of the individual’s pregnancy.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal program” refers to any of the following programs:

(1) The Medi-Cal Access Program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3.

(2) The Medi-Cal program, as described in this article.

(3) The Perinatal Services Program, as described in Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 14148).

(c) The department shall seek any federal approvals, including under Titles XIX and XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), that it determines are necessary to extend coverage for eligible pregnant and postpartum individuals or targeted low-income children as described in this section.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), coverage described in
 this section shall commence on April 1, 2022, or the effective date or dates reflected in any necessary federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (c), whichever is later.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), coverage described in this section for populations authorized under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa) shall be effective on the date reflected in any necessary federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any
 further regulatory action.

(f) Implementation of this section is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, or any other act approved by the Legislature, for the purposes described in this section.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(2) With respect to coverage described in the section for populations authorized under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa), the department may implement this section prior to receipt of all necessary federal approvals, so long as the
 department determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 363.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.19.

The receipt of respite care, as defined in Section 1418.1 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not affect the eligibility of any individual with respect to benefits under this chapter, except as subject to the limitations of subdivision (c) of Section 14124.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 339, Sec. 3.   (SB 1354)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.20.

(a) The department shall adopt the option made available under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XII)) to pay allowable tuberculosis-related services for persons infected with tuberculosis.

(b) (1) Except as provided in
 paragraph (2), the income and resources of these persons may not exceed the maximum amount for a disabled person as described in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)).

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 75) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 54.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.20.

(a) The department shall adopt the option made available under Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XII)) to pay allowable tuberculosis-related services for persons infected with tuberculosis.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the income of these persons may not exceed the maximum amount for a disabled person as described in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)).

(2) Effective January 1, 2014, the income of individuals eligible under this section may not exceed the maximum amount for a disabled person as described
 in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)), as determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 14005.64.

(c) The amendments made by the act that added this subdivision shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 76) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 55.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 54 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.21.

(a) Any medically needy aged, blind, or disabled person who was categorically needy under this chapter on the basis of eligibility under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) or Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code for the month of August 1993, and was discontinued as of September 1, 1993, and who, but for the addition of Section 12200.015, would be eligible to receive benefits without a spend down of excess income in September 1993 under this chapter, shall remain eligible to receive benefits without a
 spend down of excess income under this chapter as if that person were categorically needy as long as they meet other applicable requirements.

(b) Any medically needy aged, blind, or disabled person who was eligible for benefits under this chapter as categorically needy or medically needy under subdivision (a) for the month of August 1994, shall not be responsible for paying their spend down of excess income if they had that eligibility for benefits without a
 spend down of excess income interrupted or terminated by the addition of Section 12200.017, and if they, but for Section 12200.017, would be eligible to continue receiving benefits under this chapter without a spend down of excess income.

(c) Any medically needy aged, blind, or disabled person who was eligible for benefits under this chapter as categorically needy, or as medically needy under subdivision (a) or (b), for the calendar month immediately preceding the date that the reductions in maximum
 aid payments for the state supplementary program established in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9 made in the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature are effective shall not be responsible for paying their spend down of excess income if they had that eligibility for benefits without a spend down of excess income interrupted or terminated by the reductions in maximum aid payments, and if
 they,
 but for the reductions, would be eligible to continue receiving benefits under this chapter without a spend down of excess income.

(d) Any medically needy aged, blind, or disabled person who was eligible for benefits under this chapter as categorically needy, or as medically needy under subdivisions (a), (b), or (c) for the calendar month immediately preceding the date that the reductions in maximum aid payments for the state supplementary program established in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) made in the 1996 portion of the 1995-96 Regular Session of the Legislature are effective shall not be responsible for paying
 their spend down of excess income if they had that eligibility for benefits without a spend down of excess income interrupted or terminated by the reductions in maximum aid payments, and if they, but for these reductions, would be eligible to continue receiving benefits under this chapter without a
 spend down of excess income.

(e) The department shall implement this section regardless of the availability of federal financial participation for the spend down of excess income paid from state funds pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 77.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.22.

(a) A pregnant individual is eligible for full-scope Medi-Cal benefits under Section 435.116(d)(2) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations if their income is less than or equal to 109 percent of the federal poverty level, and, effective January 1, 2022, less than or equal to 208 percent of the federal poverty level before the application of the 5-percent income disregard pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14005.64, as determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments, and the individual meets all other eligibility
 requirements.

(b) To the extent permitted by state and federal law, an individual eligible under this section shall be required to enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care health plan in those counties in which a Medi-Cal managed care health plan is available.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted.

(d) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been
 obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 76.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.23.

To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall, when determining eligibility for children under Section 1396a(l)(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code, designate a birth date by which all children who have not attained the age of 19 years will meet the age requirement of Section 1396a(l)(1)(D) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 626, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.24.

The department shall instruct counties, by means of an all county letter or similar instruction, as to the process that is to be used to ensure that each child, physical custody of whom has been voluntarily surrendered pursuant to Section 1255.7 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be determined eligible for benefits under this chapter for, at a minimum, a period of time commencing on the date physical custody is surrendered and ending on the earliest of the following dates:

(a) The last day of the
 month following the month in which the child was voluntarily surrendered under Section 1255.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The date the child is reclaimed under Section 1255.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The date the child ceases to reside in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.25.

(a) To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall exercise the option under Section 1902(e)(12) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(e)(12)) to extend continuous eligibility to children 19 years of age and younger. A child shall remain eligible pursuant to this subdivision from the date of a determination of eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits until
 the earlier of either:

(1) The end of a 12-month period following the eligibility determination.

(2) The date the individual exceeds the age of 19 years.

(b) This section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, federal financial participation is available.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall, without taking regulatory action, implement this section by means of all county letters or similar instructions. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 24, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2010, Ch. 717, Sec. 143.   (SB 853)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.255.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 14005.25, subject to paragraph (2) and subdivision (d), a child shall be continuously eligible for Medi-Cal up to, five years of age.

(2) A redetermination of Medi-Cal eligibility shall not be conducted before the child reaches five years of age, unless the department or county possesses facts indicating that the family has requested the child’s voluntary disenrollment, the child is deceased, the child is no longer a state resident, or the child’s original enrollment was based on a state or county error or on fraud, abuse, or perjury attributed to the child or the child’s representative.

(b) (1) Implementation of this section is contingent on all of the following conditions:

(A) All necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the department pursuant to subdivision (c).

(B) The Legislature has appropriated funding to implement this section after a determination that ongoing General Fund resources are available to support the ongoing implementation of this section in the 2024–25 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.

(C) The department has determined that systems have been programmed to implement this section.

(2) The department shall issue a declaration certifying the date that all conditions in paragraph (1) have been met. The department shall post the declaration on its internet website and provide a copy of the
 declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(c) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, through all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 78.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.26.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department shall exercise the option pursuant to Section 1902(a)(l0)(A)(ii)(XIV) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XIV)) to provide full-scope benefits with no spend down of excess income under this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) to optional targeted low-income children pursuant to Section 1905(u)(2)(B) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(u)(2)(B)), with family incomes up to and including 200 percent of the federal poverty level. The department shall seek federal
 approval of a state plan amendment to implement this subdivision.

(2) (A) Pursuant to Section 1902(r)(2) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(r)(2)), the department shall adopt the option to use less restrictive income and resource methodologies to exempt all resources and disregard income at or above 200 percent and up to and including 250 percent of the federal poverty level for the individuals described in paragraph (1). The department shall seek federal approval of a state plan amendment to implement this subdivision.

(B) This paragraph shall be inoperative on January 1, 2014.

(b) Effective January 1, 2014, the federal poverty level percentage income eligibility threshold used pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14005.64 to determine eligibility for medical assistance
 under subdivision (a) shall equal 261 percent of the federal poverty level.

(c) For purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section, the department may adopt the option pursuant to Section 1902(e)(13) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(e)(13)) to rely upon findings of the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board (MRMIB) regarding one or more components of eligibility.

(d) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) and subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), the department shall exercise the option pursuant to Section 1916A of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396o-1) to impose premiums for individuals described in subdivision (a) whose family income has been determined to be above 150 percent and up to and including 200 percent of the federal poverty level, after application of the income disregard
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The department shall not impose premiums under this subdivision for individuals described in subdivision (a) whose family income has been determined to be at or below 150 percent of the federal poverty level, after application of the income disregard pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The department shall obtain federal approval for the implementation of this subdivision.

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), the department shall impose a premium pursuant to subparagraph (A) for individuals whose family income has been determined to be above 160 percent and up to and including 261 percent of the federal poverty level, as determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 14005.64.

(2) (A) Monthly premiums imposed under this section shall equal thirteen
 dollars ($13) per child with a maximum contribution of thirty-nine dollars ($39) per family.

(B) Families that pay three months of required premiums in advance shall receive the fourth consecutive month of coverage with no premium required. For purposes of the discount provided by this subparagraph, family contributions paid in the Healthy Families Program for children transitioned to Medi-Cal pursuant to Section 14005.27 shall be credited as Medi-Cal premiums paid.

(C) Families that pay the required premium by an approved means of electronic funds transfer, including credit card payment, shall receive a 25-percent discount from the required premium. If the department and the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board determine that it is feasible, the department shall treat an authorization for electronic funds transfer or credit card payment to the Healthy Families Program as an
 authorization for electronic funds transfer or credit card payment to Medi-Cal.

(D) (i) Effective July 1, 2022, to the extent allowable under federal law, and notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, the department may elect not to impose premiums for an applicable coverage period on individuals whose family income has been determined to be above 160 percent and up to and including 261 percent of the federal poverty level as described in this subdivision.

(ii) If the department elects to not impose premiums for an applicable coverage period pursuant to clause (i) or elects to reinstate such premiums for a subsequent coverage period, the department shall specify that election in the published Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for the impacted state fiscal year or years, subject to appropriation by the annual Budget Act.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that all necessary federal approvals and waivers described in this section have been obtained and the enhanced rate of federal financial participation under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.) is available for targeted low-income children pursuant to that act.

(f) The department shall not enroll targeted low-income children described in this section in the Medi-Cal program until all necessary federal approvals and waivers have been obtained, and no sooner than January 1, 2013.

(g) (1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), to the extent the new budget methodology pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14154 is not fully operational, for the purposes of
 implementing this section, for individuals described in subdivision (a) whose family income has been determined to be up to and including 150 percent of the federal poverty level, as determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the department shall utilize the budgeting methodology for this population as contained in the November 2011 Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for Medi-Cal county administration costs for eligibility operations.

(B) Effective January 1, 2014, to the extent the new budget methodology pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14154 is not fully operational, for purposes of implementing this section for individuals whose family income has been determined to be up to and including 160 percent of the federal poverty level, the department shall utilize the budgeting methodology for this population as contained in the November 2011 Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate for Medi-Cal county administration
 costs for eligibility operations.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), for purposes of implementing this section, the department shall include in the Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate an amount for Medi-Cal eligibility operations associated with the individuals whose family income is determined to be above 150 percent and up to and including 200 percent of the federal poverty level, after application of the income disregard pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). In developing an estimate for this activity, the department shall consider the projected number of final eligibility determinations each county will process and projected county costs. Within 60 days of the passage of the annual Budget Act, the department shall notify each county of their allocation for this activity based upon the amount allotted in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(B) Effective January 1, 2014, for purposes of implementing this section, the department shall include in the Medi-Cal Local Assistance Estimate an amount for Medi-Cal eligibility operations associated with the individuals whose family income is determined to be above 160 percent and up to and including 261 percent of the federal poverty level.

(h) When the new budget methodology pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 14154 is fully operational, the new budget methodology shall be utilized to reimburse counties for eligibility determinations made for individuals pursuant to this section.

(i) Eligibility determinations and annual redeterminations made pursuant to this section shall be performed by county eligibility workers.

(j) In conducting
 eligibility determinations for individuals pursuant to this section and Section 14005.27, the following reporting and performance standards shall apply to all counties:

(1) Counties shall report to the department, in a manner and for a time period prescribed by the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, the number of applications processed on a monthly basis, a breakout of the applications based on income using the federal percentage of poverty levels, the final disposition of each application, including information on the approved Medi-Cal program, if applicable, and the average number of days it took to make the final eligibility determination for applications submitted directly to the county and from the single point of entry (SPE).

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the following performance standards shall be applied to counties regarding
 eligibility determinations for individuals eligible pursuant to this section:

(A) For children whose applications are received by the county human services department from the SPE, the following standards shall apply:

(i) Applications for children who are granted accelerated enrollment by the SPE shall be processed according to the timeframes specified in subdivision (d) of Section 14154.

(ii) Applications for children who are not granted accelerated enrollment by the SPE due to the existence of an already active Medi-Cal case shall be processed according to the timeframes specified in subdivision (d) of Section 14154.

(iii) For applications for children who are not described in clause (i) or (ii), 90 percent shall be processed within 10 working days of
 being received, complete and without client errors.

(iv) If an application described in this section also contains adults, and the adult applicants are required to submit additional information beyond the information provided for the children, the county shall process the eligibility for the child or children without delay, consistent with this section while gathering the necessary information to process eligibility for the adults.

(B) The department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, shall develop reporting requirements for the counties to provide regular data to the state regarding the timeliness and outcomes of applications processed by the counties that are received from the SPE.

(C) Performance thresholds and corrective action standards as set forth in Section 14154 shall apply.

(D) For applications submitted directly to the county, these applications shall be processed by the counties in accordance with the performance standards established under subdivision (d) of Section 14154.

(3) This subdivision shall be implemented no sooner than January 1, 2013.

(4) Twelve months after implementation of this section pursuant to subdivision (f), the department shall provide enrollment information regarding individuals determined eligible pursuant to subdivision (a) to the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, for purposes of this transition, the department, without taking
 any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department be allowed temporary authority as necessary to implement program changes until completion of the regulatory process.

(2) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2014. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for
 purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(l) To implement this section, the department may enter into and continue contracts with the Healthy Families Program administrative vendor, for the purposes of implementing and maintaining the necessary systems and activities for providing health care coverage to optional targeted low-income children in the Medi-Cal program for purposes of accelerated enrollment application processing by single point of entry, noneligibility-related case maintenance and premium collection, maintenance of the Health-E-App Web portal, call center staffing and operations, certified application assistant services, and reporting capabilities. To further implement this section, the department may also enter into a contract
 with the Health Care Options Broker of the department for purposes of managed care enrollment activities. The contracts entered into or amended under this section may initially be completed on a noncompetitive bid basis and are exempt from the Public Contract Code. Contracts thereafter shall be entered into or amended on a competitive bid basis and shall be subject to the Public Contract Code.

(m) (1) If at any time the director determines that this section or any part of this section may jeopardize the state’s ability to receive federal financial participation under the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), or any amendment or extension of that act, or any additional federal funds that the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, determines would be advantageous to the state, the director shall give notice to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and to the
 Department of Finance. After giving notice, this section or any part of this section shall become inoperative on the date that the director executes a declaration stating that the department has determined, in consultation with the Department of Finance, that it is necessary to cease to implement this section or a part or parts thereof, in order to receive federal financial participation, any increase in the federal medical assistance percentage available on or after October 1, 2008, or any additional federal funds that the director, in consultation with the Department of Finance, has determined would be advantageous to the state.

(2) The director shall retain the declaration described in paragraph (1), shall provide a copy of the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel, and shall post the declaration on the department’s internet website.

(3) In the event that the director makes a determination under paragraph (1) and this section ceases to be implemented, the children shall be enrolled back into the Healthy Families Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 78.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (m).)
-------------------------------------------

14005.27.

(a) Individuals enrolled in the Healthy Families Program pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code on June 27, 2012, and who are determined eligible to receive benefits pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14005.26, or, effective January 1, 2014, subdivision (b) of Section 14005.26, shall be transitioned into Medi-Cal, pursuant to this section.

(b) To the extent necessary and for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this section, in performing initial eligibility determinations for children enrolled in the Healthy Families Program pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, the department shall adopt the option pursuant to Section 1902(e)(13) of the
 federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(e)(13)) to allow the department or county human services departments to rely upon findings made by the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board (MRMIB) regarding one or more components of eligibility. The department shall seek federal approval of a state plan amendment to implement this subdivision.

(c) To the extent necessary, the department shall seek federal approval of a state plan amendment or a waiver to provide presumptive eligibility for the optional targeted low-income category of eligibility pursuant to Section 14005.26 for individuals presumptively eligible for or enrolled in the Healthy Families Program pursuant to Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code. The presumptive eligibility shall be based upon the most recent information contained in the individual’s Healthy Families Program file. The timeframe for the presumptive eligibility shall begin no
 sooner than January 1, 2013, and shall continue until a determination of Medi-Cal eligibility is made, which determination shall be performed within one year of the individual’s Healthy Families Program annual review date.

(d) (1) The California Health and Human Services Agency, in consultation with the Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board, the State Department of Health Care Services, the Department of Managed Health Care, and diverse stakeholders groups, shall provide the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature with a strategic plan for the transition of the Healthy Families Program pursuant to this section by no later than October 1, 2012. This strategic plan shall, at a minimum, address all of the following:

(A) State, county, and local administrative components that facilitate a successful subscriber transition such as communication and outreach
 to subscribers and applicants, eligibility processing, enrollment, communication, and linkage with health plan providers, payments of applicable premiums, and overall systems operation functions.

(B) Methods and processes for diverse stakeholder engagement throughout the entire transition, including all phases of the transition.

(C) State monitoring of managed care health plans’ performance and accountability for provision of services, and initial quality indicators for children and adolescents transitioning to Medi-Cal.

(D) Health care and dental delivery system components such as standards for informing and enrollment materials, network adequacy, performance measures and metrics, fiscal solvency, and related factors that ensure timely access to quality health and dental care for children and adolescents
 transitioning to Medi-Cal.

(E) Inclusion of applicable operational steps, timelines, and key milestones.

(F) A time certain for the transfer of the Healthy Families Advisory Board, as described in Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) The intent of this strategic plan is to serve as an overall guide for the development of each plan for each phase of this transition, pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, of subdivision (e), to ensure clarity and consistency in approach and subscriber continuity of care. This strategic plan may also be updated by the California Health and Human Services Agency as applicable and provided to the Legislature upon completion.

(e) (1) The department shall transition individuals from the Healthy Families Program to the Medi-Cal program in four phases, as follows:

(A) Phase 1. Individuals enrolled in a Healthy Families Program health plan that is a Medi-Cal managed care health plan shall be enrolled in the same plan no earlier than January 1, 2013, pursuant to the requirements of this section and Section 14011.6, and to the extent the individual is otherwise eligible under this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(B) Phase 2. Individuals enrolled in a Healthy Families Program managed care health plan that is a subcontractor of a Medi-Cal managed health care plan, to the extent possible, shall be enrolled into a Medi-Cal managed health care plan that includes the individuals’ current plan pursuant to the requirements of this section and Section 14011.6,
 and to the extent the individuals are otherwise eligible under this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200). The transition of individuals described in this subparagraph shall begin no earlier than April 1, 2013.

(C) Phase 3. Individuals enrolled in a Healthy Families Program plan that is not a Medi-Cal managed care plan and does not contract or subcontract with a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan in that county. Enrollment shall include consideration of the individuals’ primary care providers pursuant to the requirements of this section and Section 14011.6, and to the extent the individuals are otherwise eligible under this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200). The transition of individuals described in this subparagraph shall begin no earlier than August 1, 2013.

(D) Phase 4.

(i) Individuals residing in a county that is not a Medi-Cal managed care county shall be provided services under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, subject to clause (ii). The transition of individuals described in this subparagraph shall begin no earlier than September 1, 2013.

(ii) In the event the department creates a managed health care system in the counties described in clause (i), individuals residing in those counties shall be enrolled in managed health care plans pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(2) For the transition of individuals pursuant to subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1), implementation plans shall be developed to ensure state and county systems readiness, health plan network adequacy, and continuity of care with the goal of ensuring
 there is no disruption of service and there is continued access to coverage for all transitioning individuals. If an individual is not retained with the individual’s primary care provider, the implementation plan shall require the managed care plan to report to the department as to how continuity of care is being provided. Transition of individuals described in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1) shall not occur until 90 days after the department has submitted an implementation plan to the fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature. The implementation plans shall include, but not be limited to, information on health and dental plan network adequacy, continuity of care, eligibility and enrollment requirements, consumer protections, and family notifications.

(3) The following requirements shall be in place prior to implementation of Phase 1, and shall be required for all phases of the transition:
